District of Columbia statutes.
32-512

Effect on other laws.

Nothing in this chapter shall supersede any provision of law that provides greater employee family or medical leave rights than the family or medical rights established under this chapter.

Oct. 3, 1990, D.C. Law 8-181, § 13, 37 DCR 5043
1981 Ed., § 36-1312.